Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,167
Nebraska Environmental Trust Act, how cited.

Sections 81-15,167 to 81-15,176 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Environmental Trust Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 44;

Laws 2000, LB 957, § 7;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 48.